Arkansas, session 2025, HB1812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2913(a)(2)(D), concerning criteria
considered by the State Board of Education for determining the level of
support to be provided to a public school district, is amended to read as
follows:
(D) Other criteria the state board determines appropriate,
including without limitation:
(i) Feeder pattern performance;
(ii)(a) Graduation rates.
(b) However, for purposes of this section, a
*TNL279*
04-09-2025 14:12:08 TNL279

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1812
student who passes a GED test shall not be counted as a dropout when
calculating a public school district's five-year graduation rate;
(iii) Growth calculations; and
(iv) Other indicators of school success.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(a)(2), concerning exceptions to
the requirement that each child of a certain age shall enroll in and attend a
school, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A child who has received a GED or a high school diploma or
its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Education is not subject
to the attendance requirement under this section;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(a)(4), concerning exceptions to
the requirement that each child of a certain age shall enroll in and attend a
school, is amended to read as follows:
(4) A child sixteen (16) years of age or older who is enrolled
in an adult education program under subsection (b) of this section or in the
Arkansas National Guard Youth Challenge Program is not subject to the
attendance requirement under this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(c)(1), concerning a student
enrolled in a private, parochial, or home school who wishes to enroll in an
adult education program or take the GED test, are amended to read as follows:
(c) Students sixteen (16) years of age or seventeen (17) years of age
enrolled in a private, parochial, or home school who desire to enroll in an
adult education program shall meet the following requirements:
(1)(A) Students shall apply for enrollment to the adult
education program.
(B) A student enrolled in a private or parochial school
shall provide:
(i) Provide a letter from the principal or
administrator of the private or parochial school to verify enrollment; and
shall
(ii) Achieve a score 8.5 grade level or above as
determined by the Adult Education Section on either the Test for Adult Basic
Education or a minimum score of four hundred fifty (450) on each section and
04-09-2025 14:12:08 TNL279

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1812
a minimum composite score of four hundred ninety (490) on the GED practice
test.
(C) A student that is home schooled shall provide a
notarized copy of the notice of intent to home school provided to the
superintendent of the local school district as required by § 6-15-503;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(d), concerning a student enrolled
in a private, parochial, or home school who wishes to take the GED test, is
amended to read as follows:
(d) Students age sixteen (16) or above enrolled in a public, private,
parochial, or home school who desire to take the GED test shall meet the
following requirements:
(1) A public school student shall not be required to obtain
permission or approval from any official in a the public school district in
which he or she is enrolled before being allowed to take the test;
(2) A student enrolled in a private or parochial school shall
provide a letter from the principal or administrator of the private or
parochial school to verify enrollment;
(3) A student enrolled in a home school shall provide a
notarized copy of the notice of intent to home school provided to the
superintendent of the local school district as required by § 6-15-503; and
(4) A student enrolled in a public, private, parochial, or home
school must achieve at least the minimum official GED practice test scores.

/s/Gramlich











04-09-2025 14:12:08 TNL279